Mississippi, session 2026, HB1534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Energy Security and Agricultural Growth Act". SECTION 2. The Legislature finds that: (a)  Mississippi's energy independence and economic competitiveness rely on a diverse "all-of-the-above" energy portfolio. (b)  Natural gas is the essential reliability partner for intermittent renewable sources, ensuring 24/7 grid stability for residents and industry. (c)  The emergence of Renewable Natural Gas (RNG) provides a historic opportunity for Mississippi's poultry and livestock farmers to convert agricultural waste into a clean, value-added energy product. (d)  Formalizing these definitions will attract global industrial investment and protect Mississippians from federally mandated energy cost increases. SECTION 3. (1)  Any state agency or political subdivision that imposes requirements or incentives related to the use of "clean", "renewable", or "sustainable" energy shall include the following as permissible sources: (a)  Solar energy and photovoltaic cells; (b)  Wind and Hydropower; (c)  Nuclear power; (d)  "Renewable Natural Gas" or "RNG", which means methane captured from organic waste, including, but not limited to, poultry litter, livestock manure, landfills, and wastewater treatment; (e)  "Advanced Natural Gas", which means natural gas utilized in conjunction with carbon capture, utilization, and storage (CCUS) or high-efficiency combined heat and power (CHP) systems; (f)  Hydrogen fuel and wood fiber products; (g)  Dedicated crops grown for energy production. (2)  A public utility meets any "clean energy" requirement if it utilizes one (1) or more of the sources listed in subsection (1). SECTION 4.  To ensure that the transition to a cleaner energy grid does not burden Mississippi families: (a)  The Public Service Commission shall ensure that any "clean energy" investment remains the least-cost option for ratepayers; and (b)  No utility shall be mandated to retire reliable natural gas infrastructure if such retirement results in a projected increase in consumer rates or a decrease in grid reliability. SECTION 5. The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce is authorized to assist poultry and livestock producers in the development of anaerobic digesters to produce RNG, recognizing such producers as "Energy Harvest Partners" in the state's renewable energy economy. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.